%BOM---------------------
Date:8/8/2002 2:56:37 AM
From:Dale Baker
OCPI - I just built a position here with 1.18 average - horrible sector but
OCPI is one of the few FO component stocks that reduced costs to avoid cash
burn even while the sector stumbles along in a depression. With $1.34 cash on
hand, downside is very limited.

This is one of the leftover stub companies that should be consolidated once the
industry gets on its feet and the stronger players are in the mood to make
acquisitions again.

ZIXI - the opposite story, running out of cash and no hope of generating
significant business. I expect to hear about Caymans financing any day now. I
am holding November 5 puts with the idea that ZIXI could be delisted by options
expiration that month.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/8/2002 11:48:32 AM
From:Grommit
SGR - I picked up some nice SGR today. At least I think it was nice. You never
know...

http://quote.yahoo.com/q?s=sgr&d=0b

The company said the project cancellation would have no material impact on its
fiscal fourth-quarter earnings, but said it was reducing its fiscal 2003
forecast to earnings to a range of $2.72 to $3.00 per share, from a range of
$2.90 to $3.18 per share.

Not pleased with all the insider selling in April, because I bought a small
amount in March.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/8/2002 2:48:10 PM
From:Bob Rudd
SGR - So did I @14.05. Merrill says worst case scenario if all below investment
grade contracts were cancelled they would still make $2 in 03. This is
comparable to prior trough valuations over the last decade. Purchases from
similar troughs have typically produced better than a double over the following
year. I danced in and out of this flat in the mid 30's. 1st position since.
There's price risk from further negative newsflow...contract cancellations, so
even if substantially undervalued it could become more so...a phenomenon not
exactly unknown to participants on this board.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/8/2002 6:05:45 PM
From:Paul Senior
I keep looking but passing on SGR. I could see where they might earn $2.00/sh
in '03 worst case, or maybe $2.30+ if one takes out only those projects by
subtiers like Mirant. That still makes the p/e attractive. However, at lows in
the past, SGR has sold for p/e's 5 or 6 times earnings. And that was when ltd
was much lower (d/e ratios lower too). OTOH, in years past SGR has also
inevitably sold at p/e's higher than current, so it's possible, maybe likely,
that people buying today will have a very good opportunity to get out with a
profit.

For me, I'm waiting to see if I can get SGR at lower price if/when any other
cancellations are announced.

Paul Senior
Jmo. And I've been wrong many, many times.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/8/2002 9:50:38 PM
From:Broken_Clock
Hi Bob,
Yahoo show $10+ in cash on SGR and BV north of $15. Debt not too high, although
I confess I'm not the swiftest at reading those financials. Doesn't it look as
though there is enough cash to almost pay off the debt? If so, then SGR is
nearly net @$15.40 with projected earnings of $2+/- next year....Seems like a
rare bird these days.

Volatility is high on the options as well. Covered calls?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/8/2002 10:57:06 PM
From:Don Earl
Anyone like life insurance companies for short play?

Life insurance companies seem to be the main buyers in high yield, unregistered
corporate debt. Since that type of debt isn't publicly traded, it's accounted
for at cost rather than marked to market, regardless of any change in
fundamental condition of companies issuing the debt. It also seems to me that
in a soft economy life insurance would be the first expense to be dumped by
consumers. Insurance companies operate almost like giant mutual funds with huge
portfolios of stock. It seems to me they would be way out on a limb in a bear
market. I've started positions in several large caps and am curious if anyone
can think of a good reason why the sector wouldn't be just about perfect for
short play in the current market and economy?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/8/2002 11:30:38 PM
From:- with a K
SGR >> Not pleased with all the insider selling in April, because I bought a
small amount in March.

Shaw in recent Forbes article on insider buying. Snip:

"We set our screens to find companies where insider stock purchases have
outnumbered sales in the last six months. To tighten the list, we restricted
our search to companies with market capitalizations greater than $500 million,
latest 12-month price-to-earnings ratios of 25 or less, and PSRs beneath their
five-year averages. Estimated next 12-month P/Es for this group average just
11.

Headquartered in Baton Rouge, La., Shaw Group (nyse: SGR - news - people ) is
the top U.S. manufacturer of prefabricated piping systems for utilities and
other customers in the power industry; the company is also a provider of
related engineering and consulting services. In addition, Shaw has a
significant presence abroad, such as its recent joint-venture agreement with
Yangzi Petrochemical to build a pipe-fabrication facility in China.

Although some insiders at the Shaw Group sold off 20,000 shares in recent
months, insider buying was stronger, with 142,000 shares purchased.

Shaw Group's stock, down 41% from its 52-week high, looks like a bargain.
Analysts reporting to Thomson Financial/IBES predict that the company will earn
$2.92 per share over the next 12 months, giving the stock a 12-month forward
estimated P/E of just 7.

Based on that number, and a long-term earnings growth estimate of 20%
(annualized), the stock's price-to-earnings growth ratio, or PEG, comes in at
just 0.4. PEGs under 1 are generally deemed a sign of a cheap stock."

*********************************************

SGR looks interesting to me, too, at this low price. Here's a nice write up
Christopher did earlier on the NAIC thread:
http://www.siliconinvestor.com/readmsg.aspx?msgid=16980176&s=sgr
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/9/2002 11:31:34 AM
From:Allen Furlan
Grommit,SGR, that makes three for the money. I wonder if Paul Senior is still
tracking 3 baggers on the thread. I bought right after first bad new at 16 net
of a August 17.5 call. More interesting is the convertible bond. This LYON with
a 05/2004 put at 683.61 is selling in low 500s. Put can be in stock or cash but
stock is at market price when put.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/9/2002 12:18:22 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Papaya: <<Doesn't it look as though there is enough cash to almost pay off the
debt?>> Pretty much. According to the Q they have 15mm net cash if you include
escrowed cash, 81mm net debt if you exclude the escrowed cash. Recent Merrill
report states they have no net debt as of May, the date of the Q.
<<projected earnings of $2+/- next year>>That's a worse case scenario. After
the bad news, they are currently expected to earn 2.76 in 03.
Even if more bad credit Utilities cancel plants [all of these would be canceled
in the worst case $2/share], the driver on plant construction is demand for
electricity which is not exactly discretionary...construction may be delayed,
but it will be done.
<<Covered calls? >> I really don't do options, but if I did, I'd be disinclined
to limit the upside...an unpredictable weather twist, a few brownouts could
juice the markets.
Please note though that my track record on energy investing has generally
sucked.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/9/2002 12:55:11 PM
From:Paul Senior
Allen Furlan: three-people picks:

http://www.siliconinvestor.com/portfolio/detail.gsp?pid=9293156

(Thread: let me know of any additions or corrections.)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/9/2002 1:25:18 PM
From:Sergio H
I think SCR.A qualifies. OEH's earnings report came in at expectations, btw.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/9/2002 2:28:47 PM
From:Paul Senior
Godot: Short answer is it doesn't qualify. Longer answer follows:

We both own and agree that SCRa is a value stock. But there have not been three
people who've posted here this year that they've bought the stock this year.
Therefore it doesn't qualify for the list.

background:
I set up the three-people pick as a result of a cursory study (in '98 or '99) I
did of people's picks here and their stocks' subsequent performance. Given that
value picks take some time to work out - like maybe years - I recorded the
picks mentioned in each year so I could track performance in subsequent years.
The study showed that if three people posted here that they bought a stock,
that stock did turn out to be a winner. Which makes some sense to me: I've
learned that value players are different as to what and how they perceive
value. So if three people, coming at it from three different perspectives,
agree that a particular stock is a value stock, that stock is perhaps indeed
very much a value stock. Additionally, I point out that for all the stocks
mentioned on this thread, and for all the people here (lurkers, regulars,
occasionals), there are relatively few stocks in a year that three people here
will say they ponied up their money for.

I believe the three-person list is good as a conversation topic or thought
provoker. Imo though, the three-person pick idea isn't working so well now as
an assured signaller of which stocks to buy. Last year, for example, we had
some picks that went bankrupt or near bankrupt (phoney accounting, non-existent
sales, crooked managers - all very difficult to detect). And the first two
picks this year too have just been disasters. (MIR and ELN).

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/9/2002 2:43:39 PM
From:Bob Rudd
PALM: Started today @.71. Has .41 net cash per share and leading position in
Handheld market. Operating system leadership is valuable business position
despite lack of profitability. This is highly speculative based on the S&P
delisting pushing already depressed shares to excessive lows.
On 8/2 picked up some AMAT @13.42 loosely based on Marty Whitman's idea that
it's gonna sell at multiple of peak earnings that should lead to a double
within next 4 years.
In late 99 there was a boomlet of PC buying in prep for y2k. Those puppies
getting a bit long in the tooth as they celebrate 3 year birthdays. AMAT is
leader and gaining share. Any whiff of demand revival and it'll jump cause
institutions know and love it.
Both of the above are small speculative seat of the pants nibbles.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/9/2002 2:46:55 PM
From:Paul Senior
I'll add to my PCL position today.

I assume the stock's off on UBS Warburg downgrade to "reduce".

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=pcl&d=t

also, and for some ideas:

http://www.forbes.com/2002/08/09/0809adviser.html?partner=yahoo&referrer=
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/9/2002 3:24:33 PM
From:Paul Senior
Bob Rudd, speaking of Marty Whitman, he must be one of only a few pros who like
MONY (MNY).

Yahoo shows that 10 of the 10 analysts who follow MNY rate it as a hold or
sell.

If MNY could only earn even 8% again on its $42+ book value, that would be
about $3.36. Stock might move back up from its current lows (about $27 now).
May take me about 18 months to find out.

I started a position after Wednesday's latest downgrade. Also for me, "a small
speculative seat of the pants nibble."
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/9/2002 5:08:56 PM
From:Paul Senior
I've started a position in CKR today. Stock is reasonable based on it p/sales,
imo. Debt is high. I'm neutral about its expected 10x p/e for this year.

These hamburger joint stocks have dropped due to another mad cow scare.

At some point,MCD might be a buy. Maybe now? And maybe a better (safer) bet
than CKR?

Paul Senior
(I'm still holding JBX among the hamburger fast-food stocks.)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/9/2002 7:50:35 PM
From:Don Earl
Paul,

<<<And the first two picks this year too have just been disasters. (MIR and
ELN).>>>

Speaking of MIR, I ran across this and thought it was interesting:

http://www.forbes.com/2002/08/09/0809ceopay.html?partner=yahoo&referrer=

I've seen other posters mention avoiding companies where compensation appears
excessive. The article is more than a little interesting as it tends show a
relationship between the place where the fiduciary duty to shareholders departs
in relation to greedy compensation. As a rule of thumb I shy away from
companies where the top executive makes over $400K for a small cap, $800K for a
mid cap, and $1.5M for a large cap. IMO, those seem to be the thresholds where
the incentive to run scams outweigh the incentive to run businesses. I guess I
figure if a chief executive has managed to acquire a lifestyle requiring much
more than that, he doesn't have a lot of time left over to spend at the office.
I've seen cases where compensation for the top 5 executives amounts to over .50
per share per year which severely limits the upside potential of the stock.
Also, whenever these companies restructure, it's always from the bottom up
(where most of the productions and customer service is done) instead of the top
down. The last executive I saw offer to take a pay cut to control expenses was
Marc Andressen back around 1997 when Netscape was getting clobbered. I won't
hold my breath waiting for the next one. These days I tend to assume most of
them will need the extra cash to cover the cost of bribes and O. J. Simpson
defense attorneys.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/9/2002 8:12:59 PM
From:TimbaBear
Don Earl

Interesting article.

Did you see in Forbe's other article at that link that of the busiest 5
directors of public companies two were on DELL's board? Michael Miles and
William H. Gray.

http://www.forbes.com/2002/08/08/0808overworkedpackage.html

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/9/2002 8:21:54 PM
From:249443
re: PCL

http://www.siliconinvestor.com/readmsg.aspx?msgid=16694013

Paul -- although the above ariticle is 1-year old, it is nevertheless
interesting. Regarding recent news: the cash flow vs. dividend news has been
well-known for quite some time. I would prefer to see the REIT status removed
as I feel it puts a squeeze on corporate uses of cash flow.

I like the company and have the management. They do seem credible and I like
the independent nature of timber vs. the typical stock business model.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/10/2002 1:26:17 AM
From:Paul Senior
Spekulatius, I'll add your pick of AZ to my watch list, and begin some
consideration of it.

I show that AZ is a distant #3 (by market cap) in the prop. casualty insurance
sector, after AIG and Berkshire. I have not done well with these larger
players. Never owned Berkshire (sigh), and I wasn't quick enough to add to my
most tiny position in AIG when it was more than 10 points lower during those
"bad days" of July 21-24.

Many of the stocks in this sector have been discussed here before, and
investors who bought at those times subsequently had opportunities to sell
profitably. Some examples would be Allstate (#4 in market cap) when its stock
swooned a couple of years ago; MBI and ABK which used to be a subject of an
occasional discussion between Jim Clarke and me; and perhaps St. Paul, Markel,
Radian, or Renaissance Re that people mentioned here a while ago. And just in
the past month, Dale Baker has suggested IPCR as a buy.

There've been at least a couple of losers too: ESREF (if one still holds it, as
I do), FFH.to maybe. (This latter one I summarize by saying it looked and still
looks good on the surface, but some people here or on Buffetology thread may
have astutely warned away investors by suggesting there were trust issues with
management.) I myself have mentioned a couple on this thread that eventually
went bankrupt. (I will assuage my conscious by assuming that nobody paid too
much attention to my suggestions then as now.)

Perhaps we have here an example of value investors approaching stocks from
different perspectives? I sometimes like to screen for insurance stocks that
look to me like bargain prices. I assume you bring much more of an
internationalist's perspective. For example, when the subject was
pharmaceuticals, you reminded the thread of the opportunities in some Swiss
stocks (PHA under 40 for example).

Anyway, thanks for mentioning AZ. It can't compare to BRK or AIG, but then
again, it is large and substantial - a respected company that doesn't have the
high p/e or higher p/sales or higher price/stated book that #1 or #2 have.

jmo,
Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/10/2002 1:53:24 AM
From:Paul Senior
Wallace Rivers: I looked at SV, HOT, FBF. Looks like FBF escaped some trouble
with the Brazil bailout. Maybe the time to buy was before the announcement? I
don't know enough about its exposures to Argentina or other Latin Am.
countries. Pass on HOT as well. Revpar down and I see this with a couple of
hotel stocks I own as well. I've been looking at SV, but will likely pass on it
for now. I'm NO fan of their Janus funds, but otoh, each SV share has $8 (??)
worth of the subsidiary DST shares.

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=fbf+hot+sv&d=t
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/10/2002 3:40:47 AM
From:Larry S.
HI, have been lurking here the past few weeks. While SV might have some appeal
on the numbers, I would avoid any connection with Janus. They are likely to
continue to have an exit flow of funds, and they have morphed into common value
type wannabes and still on the wrong road growth funds. FBF has appeal, but has
too many issues for me. My fav in the banking sector is STT - State Street,
which acts as custodian for trillions of dollars of mutual fund assets and gets
a nickle or so for every mutual fund account, no matter how well they do. long
term chart on STT: http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=STT&d=c&t=my&l=on&z=b&q=l larry
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/10/2002 6:19:35 AM
From:Dale Baker
COGI - no one else has mentioned this one, I would appreciate other points of
view on the valuation:

http://biz.yahoo.com/p/C/COGI.html

The current share price under $2 is bizarre for a profitable, growing company
with likely 2002-2003 earnings well over .20 each. Am I missing something?

ACGL had a terrific report Thursday, beating estimates by a mile but no one
noticed. At $27, I am holding for a move to $40's eventually. Opinions welcome
there too.

MAXF earnings should be out soon - they preannounced .25 for the quarter but
maybe we can get some idea of their projections going forward (they are
notoriously tight-lipped about guidance).

FMT - recent acquisition in low 4's, a turnaround story with great promise
based on their recent earnings.

I won't crunch all the numbers in these stocks myself since I would like others
to take a fresh view and give their reactions if interested.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/10/2002 2:08:52 PM
From:Seeker of Truth
I have a rule of thumb which is that when the short ratio is very high, say
over six, then one should avoid the stock. It's kept me out of trouble but
naturally the sample size is too small to justify any strong advocacy of this
"rule." Your trial investment in MNY defies a legion of short sellers. It's an
interesting experiment. My guess, and it's a rather ignorant guess, is that the
short sellers do more homework than the longs. So when they gang up on a stock
it is likely a bad buy. I may be talking nonsense, of course.
Good luck, anyway.
O BTW, I have no position in MNY, long or short.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/10/2002 3:45:55 PM
From:Sergio H
Thanks for the long and the short Paul.

Good article in today's Barron's regarding best sources for insider trading
information.

Godot
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/10/2002 5:40:20 PM
From:Paul Senior
Don Earl: I like your general rule about compensation amounts. I'll try to be
alert to it as I check out companies to invest in.

(ed.: building up to a vent, which follows)

I used to avoid companies that paid excessively, but I found that the stocks of
some of those companies subsequently did very well nevertheless (could've just
been the bull market). I will say my standards for pay must be frozen in a
different time or at a younger age. Because now it seems to me that SO many
execs look overpaid. As a result, there'd be very few stocks to invest in if I
focused too much on compensation. In any case, I have voted against options in
all proxy forms sent to me. In most of these too, I've voted also against all
directors (because they have allowed the options vote to occur knowing that its
passage is almost assured).

I don't even want to talk about repricing of options. Or giving options to
incent or incentivize (whatever the jargon is) 55-year old guys who've already
been hugging their companies for 30 years. Or for that matter the issue as to
whether it's at all necessary to issue stock options to allegedly incent people
when those people are in multi-division operations which have different
business cycles.

I'm buying a small starter position in a multinational giant where the stock is
so low that the last or earlier batches of executive options isn't profitable
for those folks. I am finding that there's a new batch of options that's going
to be awarded in February. So now I'm in contraposition to the executives! They
have an incentive to see that the stock stays low or goes lower so that they
can get those options in February at the lowest possible exercise price. I
don't call that a desirable incentive. (Aside: Perhaps Mr. Buffett or Dr.
Graham would say a further lower price also gives me the opportunity to get
more stock bargain-basement prices, and that I should welcome it and try to
take advantage of it. It's just that sometimes - like NOW- I am getting tired
of these opportunities to average down!!)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/10/2002 6:47:21 PM
From:Paul Senior
Malcolm Bersohn. Yes, several people here consider a stock's short ratio
figures in making their buying decision.

I mostly do not.

I am certainly an easy target when it comes to "homework", shorts or no shorts.
People on the thread are pretty kind to me, but it's fairly evident that if I
have the number of stocks I say I own or am buying, that I can't possibly be
doing in-depth, detailed dd. If the position is new to me (like MNY) and if
what I post about it is it, then it's reasonable to assume I haven't studied it
long and hard enough or owned it long enough to have much depth in discussing
the stock, its business or its prospects.

MNY can drop further, as the shorts are betting. I don't see where it's going
out of business though (and of course, I could be very wrong). Looking out
18-24 months, this stock has assets and resources that could (should) enable it
to post respectable earnings, given its current (low) price. At last report two
value funds were big owners (I assume they still are): Southeastern Asset
Management and Third Avenue (Marty Whitman of "safe and cheap".)

Sometimes I have the impression that shorts take on their positions because a
particular stock is declining and this fits a macro strategy the shorts believe
in. For example, with the two or three subprime lenders I've been buying last
week, the short argument is that the balance sheets are so loaded with debt,
that if customer defaults increase - and that is a decent likelihood given
layoffs or further indications of a slow or declining economy - then equity on
the balance sheet will be trashed, earnings will be wiped out, and the stocks
will decrease further. These companies all have high short positions and a
vocal short community. I see the companies as big and geographically dispersed
having stocks at multiyear lows, low p/sales, low price/book, and still earning
(assuming accounting is real) profits. Buys for me.

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/10/2002 10:58:06 PM
From:Don Earl
Paul,

<<<It's just that sometimes - like NOW- I am getting tired of these
opportunities to average down!!>>>

I used to be a big fan of cost averaging, but it seemed like there were too
many times where I kept ending up with too large a position on certain issues
that just kept going lower. In most of those cases I would have been a lot
better off stopping out when it became obvious there was something wrong with
my timing, or at least limiting my exposure to the original position. There
have been times when I've done well with cost averaging, but overall I've lost
more on the strategy than I've won. I've seen a lot of discussion over the
years on averaging down, both pro and con, and to be honest, I really don't
know exactly where I stand on the strategy as of this writing. Since it's less
expensive to fix a mistake early than late, I suppose I'm leaning more toward
fairly tight stops these days rather than cost averaging, although I've used
both methods in the past several months depending my mood at the time.

I agree with your point that focusing too much on compensation issues could
tend to limit the list of possible investments under current conditions. I also
relate to the idea that repricing options is a slap in the face to
shareholders. Maybe the worst impact on the whole option issue is that insiders
rarely make purchases on the open market anymore. Once upon a time it helped to
find the bottom in business cycles as that was when insiders considered their
stock too cheap to pass up. Now they just load themselves up with options and
dump the underlying stock anytime the options are in the money. So far I
haven't seen any proposal surrounding the topic of the abuse of options which
feels satisfactory. Since no two companies treat options quite the same way, I
suppose it bothers me to see bureaucrats leaning toward a one size fits all
rule on how they should be treated on the balance sheet. Issuing new stock to
cover options on a few hundred shares issued to a computer programmer to keep
cash expenses down, is a lot different than purchasing a million shares on the
open market to issue to Michael Dell below the purchase price. Whatever.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/10/2002 11:17:02 PM
From:Don Earl
Timba,

I suspect most so called outside directors are chosen for their willingness to
rubber stamp whatever insiders want them to vote for. At least it doesn't seem
likely any known rabble rousers names will show up on the usual one party
ballot. Half the time outside directors don't even show up for the meetings. A
better system would probably be to require at least one outside director who
has no affiliation with any public company other than being a shareholder.
Start with the largest holder and work down the list until they find one who
wants the job. I don't think picking from a list of members of the ol' boys
club is going to change anything.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 9:33:14 AM
From:sjemmeri
>Issuing new stock to cover options on a few hundred shares issued to a
computer programmer to keep cash expenses down, is a lot different than
purchasing a million shares on the open market to issue to Michael Dell below
the purchase price.

I'm inferring from this statement that you are bothered more by the latter than
the former. As I consider the relevance of options to an investment decision, I
find myself leaning the other way. My reasoning is if options are used to
compensate most or all employees (or buy materials/services needed as suggested
by Mr. B.) than on a cash basis the business itself is unsustainable. However,
if most or all of the options are going to the CEO and a few of his cohorts,
they are (as suggested by Timba's analysis) pocketing all the profits. While
that may be offensive, at least the business makes profits available for
pocketing. And if an analysis indicates that market capitalization is cheap
relative to those profits, the business should be attractive as a takeover by a
company that may decide to dump the ceo and his posse, thereby, cutting that
'expense' and gaining the otherwise profitable business. If everyone is paid in
options, then likely the enterprise would not be profitable on a cash basis to
anyone (lacking a raging bull market with escalating share prices).
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 9:40:13 AM
From:Seeker of Truth
Hello Paul,
The whole matter of investment strategy is clouded by the fact(I consider it a
fact) that a number of strategies "work", i.e. in the long run one makes SOME
money using them. The problem then is "which is the best strategy?" Some
possible ones are:
1. Buying stocks that are very unpopular as shown by the high short ratio.but
which are selling at a big discount to the book value. This book value must
have real value; it mustn't be some specialized machinery.
2. Buying stocks which are selling at a low P/E and have a high return on both
assets and equity. The companies should have low debt.
3. Buying stocks which are on Value LIne's most timely list and also have a
very high rating on the Investor's Business Daily's numbers.
4. Buying Berkshire Hathaway and forgetting about the market.
5. Buying stocks which have a control over some technology that everybody must
use, e.g. MSFT, INTC.
6. Buying stocks of companies like Walmart and Wells Fargo Bank and Toyota,
which are consistently well managed, when they are at a P/E which is relatively
low for them.
7. Avoiding stocks and buying income real estate with low leverage.
8. Buying stocks that have a "moat", a nontechnological semimonopoly such as
the Washington Post or eBay or MCO.
I suspect that any one of these strategies will bring in some return on the
money invested, over the long run. No doubt there are other reasonably
successful strategies. Now indisputably the most successful passive investor of
all time is Warren Buffett. Lately he has become quite an active investor since
he actively manages the insurance businesses of Berkshire Hathaway. It seems to
me that he uses methods 2 and 8. Using method 2 he bought See's candies and
Shaw's carpets. I assume KO belongs to strategy 8.
So after all which is the best? I submit that the best is the one that leaves
the investor with the greatest serenity. In other words our strategy must
convince ourselves. That's the most important point. If it doesn't do so then
there is something wrong right at the start. So the answer to the question
which is the best will vary among people just for this reason. What's best for
you may not be best for me. I like 6,7 and 8. If I had once paid 10% down on
some hot property and lost everything then I wouldn't like 7. etc.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 10:32:45 AM
From:j g cordes
TimbaBear

re ".. I hope your investing decisions are better thought out than this type of
rationale."

You're right, they are better thought out and consistently make money. For
example I bought Dell Aug 25 calls at 1.50 per contract the Monday before last
and sold them for 2.30. Then bought them again at .90 and will sell tomorrow on
the jump from the Barrons article as reviewed here by CBS Marketwatch, that
sounds amazingly similar to what I posted to you last Sunday.

"Among big-name hardware makers, Dell Computer (DELL: news, chart, profile)
gets some of the sector's highest marks for not just being the leading personal
computer-maker, but also for the company's willingness to use its direct-sales
model to move into other technologies such as storage and servers. Dell also
appears headed into the printer market and reportedly is close to launching its
own line of personal digital assistants."

While I fully support and subscribe to conservative investment analysis, there
is often a missing key ingredient.

One makes or loses money in the market not due to the soundness of the company
one invests in but when one buys and when one sells. The less one pays
attention or is right on timing the longer one's time horizon must be in order
for the underlying strengths of the company to manifest itself in price
appreciation. If there's a dividend, that too becomes a factor.

It may be argued that timing a stocks price or timing the market is impossible,
it in fact does happen and is the holy grail of funds, hedge funds, derivatives
and futures players. Our behavior, both as individuals and as participants in
group behavior, move prices up and down.. we are always timing the market by
the choices we make.

There is a place for both long term investment and short term opportunity
scalping. I practice both.. I bought ALSC for example in early 99 then sold a
year later. The logic which makes a Dell unattractive because of its options
exposure is irrelevant within price swings and trend probabilities. The logic
that makes an AIG attractive is irrelevant within the trading window afforded
by an analysts upgrade or downgrade.

So I hope in your deep analysis you don't lose sight of the only reason one
should be in the market.. that being to make money.

Money is only made or lost after the investment play is concluded, after the
equity or derivative is sold or closed. The rest is just smoke and mirrors we
satisfy our egos and insecurities with (all puns intended).

Jim
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 11:51:46 AM
From:TimbaBear
Steven

...However, if most or all of the options are going to the CEO and a few of his
cohorts, they are (as suggested by Timba's analysis) pocketing all the profits.
While that may be offensive, at least the business makes profits available for
pocketing. And if an analysis indicates that market capitalization is cheap
relative to those profits, the business should be attractive as a takeover by a
company that may decide to dump the ceo and his posse, thereby, cutting that
'expense' and gaining the otherwise profitable business...

While this is an interesting theory, the only way I can see to play it would be
if an offer had already been made by a company whose management is highly
respected for its commitment to the shareholder. To hope that a "white knight"
would come along someday, or to hope that the current management would be
willing to give up the ride on the gravy train for anything close to a bargain
price, I think would be too close to folly for a wise investor.

I think a more likely outcome to your scenario would be for another group of
greedy management to see the value of the gravy train for themselves and thus
they would make the offer.

I believe the prudent course is for the wise investor to select those companies
which are profitable and that have managements who have demonstrated a strong
commitment to returning the profits to the shareholder while still conducting a
growing business.

In the case of your scenario, the wise investor, once becoming convinced of the
greed of the management being evidenced by the prevention of the flow of
profits to the benefit of the shareholder, if they own the company, should get
rid of it and employ their capital somewhere more favorable to their own
interests. Even having the money under a mattress would be better than having
it at risk in such an endeavor.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 12:44:01 PM
From:TimbaBear
j g cordes

I saw the quote you gave from Barron's and my thought was that this bear market
still has a long way to go. When managements can steal all the profits and
supposedly conservative and insightful business publications can't see it, we
haven't hit bottom. I never indicated that DELL didn't have a great business
model, in fact, I praised them for the model. What angered me was that none of
it filtered to the shareholder.

The strategies you employ would not be considered investment strategies by
Benjamin Graham, they would be considered speculative strategies.

If you believe that you have a system of strategies which is lucrative for you,
by all means employ them. But when, on this thread, you refer to them as
investments, I think you ought to expect someone to call you to task for that
terminology.

I am very proficient in the use of technical analysis and do employ it for some
of my trading. Looking at the chart formation on DELL leave's me with
impression of a rounded top formation which would be dangerous to play from a
long position. But, on this thread, I don't often refer to technical analysis
because this is a "value" thread started to use investment analysis based on
the works of Benjamin Graham as the basis for discussing the relative merits of
various companies.

One makes or loses money in the market not due to the soundness of the company
one invests in but when one buys and when one sells. The less one pays
attention or is right on timing the longer one's time horizon must be in order
for the underlying strengths of the company to manifest itself in price
appreciation. If there's a dividend, that too becomes a factor.

Obviously I disagree with your premise. The soundness of the company, the
commitment to the shareholder, and the price one pays are the key ingredients.
There has long been a debate over whether the price WEB pays for a company can
be considered market timing or not. I view it as not being about timing, but
about value. The two factors sometimes seem to coincide, but that is more
accident than goal.

It may be argued that timing a stocks price or timing the market is impossible,
it in fact does happen and is the holy grail of funds, hedge funds, derivatives
and futures players. Our behavior, both as individuals and as participants in
group behavior, move prices up and down.. we are always timing the market by
the choices we make.

I don't hold the opinion that technical analysis can't be used for timing a
purchase or sale. On this thread, however, technical analysis is not the
criteria for whether to buy into a particular investment, some of us may use it
to help determine when. But what you describe above is speculation (a purchase
decision made on some basis other than deep fundamental value), not investing
as described by Graham. The current trend in extreme daily ranges in prices of
the major indices is, indeed, indicative of widespread speculation as you
describe here. Just because something is pervasive, doesn't validate it. I do
take this level of volatility as further sign that this bear is no where close
to having run its course.

The logic which makes a Dell unattractive because of its options exposure is
irrelevant within price swings and trend probabilities. 

When fundamental danger to the well-being of an investor's capital investment
can be deemed irrelevant in any context, the mania is not over.

So I hope in your deep analysis you don't lose sight of the only reason one
should be in the market.. that being to make money

The fundamental reason I am in the market is to have my investment dollars earn
a greater rate of return than they would elsewhere. If I am to assume any risk
to principal, I wish to be compensated according to the level of risk assumed.

Money is only made or lost after the investment play is concluded, after the
equity or derivative is sold or closed. The rest is just smoke and mirrors we
satisfy our egos and insecurities with (all puns intended).

Interesting turn of phrase, "investment play". I would disagree again. Very
often money is made or lost long before the transaction is effected.

I can see why you may eschew fundamental analysis if you believe it only
satisfies ones ego and insecurity.

As before, I wish you much luck with your approach, I think you'll need it.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 12:51:19 PM
From:Paul Senior
Malcolm Bersohn:

Nice list. My perspective on how to use it is much different though. I have no
truck with the the idea that one makes "SOME" money with many methods. I don't
draw the conclusion though that the problem then becomes choosing among
alternatives on such a list for the "best strategy". It's that word "choose".
Which means some strategy must be excluded.

I am inferring - and I might be wrong - that you are suggesting that making
"some" money is suboptimizing and that one ought to try to correct for this by
choosing among alternative investing strategies. For me, I believe that it is
perfectly okay to always make "some" money, and that long-term investment
success doesn't require striving to make the "most" money by figuring the
"best" way. (I assume long-term investment success is the goal.)

I assume not all methods work well all the time and yet switching from one
strategy to another is either equivalent to timing the market or as difficult.
Therefore, I have come to the belief that one should invest in ALL the
strategies that have shown they work and NOT make either/or decisions.

Of course this itself is a choice. -g-
And as you could point out, I made this choice based on your criteria -- my
experience (convincing myself) and my comfort levels (serenity?).

Maybe I'll be on a little more solid ground discussing specific items on your
list -g-
About #3: I've never heard of anyone actually using Value Line's No.1
recommendations to consistently make money. Imo, too many stocks coupled with
too much upping and downing of the recommendations. Maybe it's better in
conjunction with IBD so as to whittle down the number of stocks. Who has been
successful with this? (Tom Veale on one of his SI threads had started to track
VL's "high growth stocks" which had (un)timeliness of 5. Seemed to be working
out okay, until the market began sinking in June.)

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 1:50:24 PM
From:j g cordes
Well Timba, its my impression you find satisfaction being entrenched in your
investment approach and chiding mine without knowing much about it, which I
have no problem with. The market is composed of many different kinds of
investors, speculators, transients and pontificators of every stripe (myself
included). I also respect the focus of this thread as most threads don't have a
great deal of consistency, something can be gained from any discipline.

In my opinion, both Graham's approach and short term speculators are attempting
to limit risk and maximize the probability of price appreciation. They are
doing so within vastly different time horizons. Warren Buffet was the candle on
Graham's cake but outside of Berkshire's and AXP stunning conglomerating
success (a business strategy not an investment strategy)., where's the
investing savy for the average bloak? Is there a filter that can be applied
easily to today's universe of stocks? Perhaps using Graham's 10 points? After a
market bursts, as the US has, a value approach will certainly limit downside
risk and may uncover some rip roaring gems.. good luck.

Anyway, here's a good article for this thread......... on Buffet, Graham,
Munger, high times and low.

Charlie Munger - Climbing Mount Wall Street
By Janet Lowe

Benjamin Graham, the Confucius of value investing, often reminded his followers
that it only takes a 50 percent drop in the price of your stock portfolio to
wipe out a previous 100 percent gain. This was Graham's way of warning that the
ride down can be faster than the ride up. On the other hand, if an investor is
truly walking the value path, one peak does not a mountain range make.

Value investors who feel the current market is cruel to them can take heart
from the experiences of Charlie Munger, who was introduced to Graham by
superinvestor Warren Buffett in the 1960s. Graham and Buffett (who later became
the world's most successful investor) were close friends but Graham was growing
older and losing interest in investing. Graham, who died in 1968, was the main
proponent of the philosophy that every stock has an intrinsic or fundamental
value, and the actual stock price fluctuates above and below that. A value
investor figures out a stock's real worth and buys while it is cheap.

Munger soon replaced Graham as Buffett's confidant and quickly the Omaha-born,
Los Angeles attorney became Buffett's partner in many investment deals.
Eventually Munger became vice chairman of Berkshire and one of its largest
shareholders. But Munger's road to wealth was rocky.

In 1962 Munger followed Buffett's suggestion and began investing money on
behalf of others, establishing the Wheeler, Munger Company, an investment
partnership. For eight years, Wheeler, Munger achieved stunning performance
results, although with about $17 million under management, the fund was not
large. When the years of 1962 to 1969 are measured together, Munger's average
return was 37.15 percent.

Then in the late 1960s the market rose dramatically, making it difficult for
value investors to find bargains. Even the Buffett Partnership, which Buffett
ran before he took over Berkshire Hathaway and transformed it into a holding
company, was down by 11.6 percent, a disappointing return for a fund that had
an average return of 30.4 percent for the 13 years it operated. In 1969 Buffett
began dissolving the partnership, and Munger surely wished he had done the
same.

In 1970 Munger's performance declined for the first time, with a return for the
year of minus 0.1 percent. In the next two years the fund rallied, but 1973 and
1974 were a nightmare. It was off 31.9 percent in 1973 (versus a negative 13.1
percent for the Dow Jones Industrial Average) and down 31.5 percent in 1974
(compared to a minus 23.1 percent for the Dow).

"We got drubbed by the 1973-74 crash, not in terms of true value, but by quoted
market value, to way half of what the securities were likely to be worth
later," said Munger. "It was tough - 1973-74 was a very unpleasant stretch."

During that time period, the Standard & Poor's 500 index gained only 5.2
percent annually, and that is with no management expenses to answer for.
Berkshire Hathaway was still a textile manufacturer at the time, and its share
price fell from $80 in December 1972 to $40 in December of 1974. Gloom
permeated Wall Street. Headlines proclaimed "The Death of Equities."

It felt that way, said Munger. "February 1, 1962 to 1973-74, basically the
world had stood still. An ordinary investment portfolio would have done nothing
in 12 years. It was a period of no rising tide to lift the boat. We had bought
amazingly good businesses and we knew that in time it was going to work out
very well. You can get a good opportunity, but will you get through the tough
stretches?"

Fortunately, Munger was able to ride out the storm and most of his investors
stayed with him. One investment partner put $350,000 in the fund at the peak of
the market, then insisted on pulling out at the bottom. The story was not
pretty. "She went into the partnership and it promptly went down," recalled
Munger. Though Munger tried to persuade her to wait it out, she did not. "She
lost half of her money." She must have shed a few tears when she saw what
happened next. The market turned around fast, and 1975 brought a whopping 73.2
percent return.

Despite the eventual triumph, the fact that some investors were damaged haunted
Munger enormously. He closed the Wheeler, Munger Partnership at the end of the
year. Munger's fund started in February 1962 with $1 million. It was liquidated
in 1976 at around $10 million. Even counting the dreary years, for the 14 years
the fund operated, it had an average annual return of 24.3 percent, before
costs.

Munger distributed the cash and actual stock holdings to the partners in the
Wheeler, Munger fund, but did not take his management fees. For investors who
held onto the stock they received in the liquidation, there was another
pleasant surprise. Along with other securities, the investors received shares
of Blue Chip Stamps, Diversified Retailing, and other companies that eventually
were folded into Berkshire Hathaway in a stock swap.

One of Munger's investors, Otis Booth, ended up with a 1.4 percent stake of
Berkshire Hathaway, a little less than Munger's 1.5 percent holding - making
both among the largest investors in the company. Both are on the Forbes Richest
Americans list. The Berkshire alignment wasn't the only good investment
decision Munger made over the years, but it was the best.

"The money in Berkshire Hathaway outperformed the rest," said Munger, who is
now 76 years old. "Nothing could compound that way. Back then Berkshire was
trading for $40 per share on shares that now (in the summer of 1999) are
trading for $65,000." Many of the original Wheeler, Munger shareholders got
Berkshire Hathaway on a cost basis ranging from $16 to $25.

Though Buffett and Munger agree that over time, a company's share price
reflects its underlying performance, they prefer to measure Berkshire's success
in terms of book value rather than share price. For the past 35 years Berkshire
has had a book value growth of 24 percent compounded annually.

Many of the acquisitions that contributed to Berkshire's success were made by
Buffett and Munger together. Buffett credits Charlie with drawing him beyond
the fundamental Graham approach of buying cheap "cigar butt investments," or
used up companies that have one last puff in them. It's no fun, says Munger, to
worry constantly that a company may croak before you get your money back. On
the other hand, Charlie says that Graham's basic principles will never be
outdated. "The investment game always involves considering both quality and
price, and the trick is to get more quality than you pay for in price. It's
just that simple."

Buffett and Munger have always warned shareholders that most businesses go
through negative cycles and Berkshire Hathaway would be no different. They
issued the pronouncement for so many consecutive years in which earnings,
shareholder equity and share price grew so robustly that investors and analysts
alike stopped listening. Then about two years ago, it became apparent that
Buffett and Munger were right.

It started with a slip in earnings in 1998. Due to the decline in the share
price of some of Berkshire's holdings and problems with a large acquisition,
the 1999 gain in net worth was only $358 million, which translated to a per
share book value increase of only 0.5 percent. Berkshire's share price
declined, the first time in more than a decade. At its peak, Berkshire A shares
traded at around $90,000. The stocks fell to a low of $40,800 before it began
an up-and-down recovery. Shares are now trading at $55,400.

Munger had cautioned investors to conduct their financial affairs so that no
matter what crazy things happen in the markets, they can stay in the game. He
said that if you can't afford for your Berkshire Hathaway stock (or any
investment holding, for that matter) to drop 50 percent, you probably shouldn't
own it.

After steadily climbing attendance at Berkshire's wildly popular spring annual
meeting, in 1999 attendance dropped, with fewer than 10,000 in the audience. As
for any wane in personal popularity that he and Buffett might suffer, Munger
says that when you've lived as long as he has you are likely to fall in and out
of vogue several times.

Overall and for the long-term, Munger is cheery about the future of Berkshire
Hathaway, for exactly the same reasons his Wheeler, Munger Partnership rebound.
"Basically, we have a wonderful bunch of businesses. We have float that keeps
increasing and a pretty good record of doing well in marketable securities.
None of that has gone away."

This article is adapted from Janet Lowe's most recent book Damn Right! The
Inside Story of Berkshire Billionaire Charlie Munger, published by John Wiley &
Sons.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 2:33:38 PM
From:TimbaBear
j g cordes

Well Timba, its my impression you find satisfaction being entrenched in your
investment approach and chiding mine without knowing much about it, which I
have no problem with.

Again, I hope your market "impressions" are better than those you have
exhibited here.

Extolling gains made on options plays and denigrating the importance of
fundamental analysis on a "value" thread can be a bit frustrating.

You appear to have a fine ability for reasoning when you choose to exhibit it
and I'm sure your insights into the factors you use to determine your
selections for long term investments would include more than short term trades
gone bad. Would be delighted to engage in a discussion of your criteria for
determing what appeals to you for the long term investment. Might even be
interested in your techniques for technical trading(but not on this thread).

Is there a filter that can be applied easily to today's universe of stocks? 

I'm sure there are. But just like you had to spend a lot of time educating
yourself about options, volatility, technical analysis, and it's components of
moving averages, stochastics, RSI, money flow, trendlines, crossovers, etc. and
how all of these react in different types of markets, so too does one have to
put in the time to learn how to interpret financial statements. As I indicated
in my analysis of DELL, short cuts (like the common one for determining FCF)
will be known by those reporting the results and, therefore, are subject to
manipulations that may not be easily uncovered by cursory inspection.

After a market bursts, as the US has, a value approach will certainly limit
downside risk and may uncover some rip roaring gems.. good luck.

There are still surprisingly few good values, so I suspect that although some
air has been let of the bubble, there's still a lot more left to be vented.

I'm sure that this market of volatility provides many opportunities for the
technical trader and, I wish you all the nimbleness and profitabilty you can
possibly achieve. Thank you for posting the article on Graham, Buffet and
Munger.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 3:28:29 PM
From:j g cordes
TimbaBear.. re " denigrating the importance of fundamental analysis." Never
said that, you must be reacting to something you ate.

As for what I believe about the market, it would be useless to begin to explain
it, but I'll start with the following:

For one, the market is not an arena designed to harbor and nurture public
investments. That's a marketing line, a promotion to sell the public they can
turn money over to others and it will be returned to them with some
appreciation.

The market is a place designed to attract and extract capital... that's it
Companies issue shares with little in the way of promise or obligation to
increase their value to anyone who purchases them. There are no guarantees. The
structure and compexities of the modern market including derivatives, futures
and other relationships has evolved to where the "market" is as much a garden
for growing companies as it is a self canabalizing entitiy.

In order for the market to thrive, for it to be a sustainable money vacuum to
seed and sustain economic growth, government, and political ambitions.. it is
given the semblance of order and regulation. However, billions upon billions
leaks constantly out of the system and it feeds an enormous populaion of
financial leaches. But its the system we have.. it could be worse, it could
also be much better.

So what of the individual investor who has saved some cash and finds the
returns in the debt market unattractive? The price one enters a trade, less the
price one exits is all there is. There is either a profit of loss, the rest is
wait and see, or strategies to offset taxes or some other accounting mishmash.

There are a hundred different ways to attempt to minimize risk. Just as there
are a hundred different ways to maximize reward. Generally its accepted that
with increased potential for gain, there's an increase in risk..

Short term players using derivatives must cut loses instantly because leverage
cuts both ways. They must use technical analysis because fundamentals don't
work their way to price changes quickly enough. However, the lessons and truths
learned in technical analysis also have value for judging long term swings and
trends.

Value investors work to discover stocks whose price valuations are
underperforming business fundamentals and future opportunity. Because millions
of people are constantly probing and proding the expectations of public
companies and because public companies are constantly promoting their
attractiveness to potential investors.. value investing is a challenge. Over
time it has its own schools of thought and parameters.

I prefer to do some of each.. exploit short term when possible and cache
profits into longer term havens.

Now I've got to take a tree limb down that overhangs the back porch.

Jim
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 3:46:39 PM
From:TimbaBear
j g cordes

Interesting philosophy, doesn't have anything to do with value investing, but
interesting in its insight into your approach to trading.

I hope you're on the right side of the branch when you start sawing.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 5:25:01 PM
From:Seeker of Truth
There's a book called "The Unemotional Investor", author Robert Sheard, which
claims extraordinary success for combining Investors Business Daily rankings
and Value Line timeliness. However all his data were from the extreme bull
market period of the 90's. Such a scheme might do worse than average in a bear
market because he's talking about the market 's favorite rockets.
You are right about my conjecture that some of these strategies only
suboptimize. Your idea about using any of them that have worked is appealing.
I'd like to comment about the choice of buying Berkshire Hathaway stock. It
seems to me that Buffett and Munger have the advantage that they can literally
interview the CEO of the company in which they want to invest and make a canny
judgement about the person. Also they are smarter than most of us.(That
includes me.) On the other hand we individual investors have the advantage of
nimbleness and small capital. It's pretty hard for Berkshire to acquire lots of
a stock fast in a way that will make a big percentage difference in their
growth. I'm a low cholesterol nut and Mr. Buffett is not so I pass on the
stock. But, objectively, I think it is a very safe good value investment.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 10:54:23 PM
From:j g cordes
Malcolm.. saying Buffett and Munger are investors stretches the common meaning
of the word. The size of their positions allows them managerial influence not
to mention the positive influence their attention garners the companies they
take positions in.

There are more specific and appropriate terms like accredited investor,
partner, institutional investor, angel investor, majority position.. all
pointing to the special status a well heeled individual or institution implies.

It seems to me some of the same concepts guiding money placement for the
wealthy might not apply to smaller accounts for just these reasons. Risk may
have to be increased.

An investor like Buffett can have considerable influence on capital
appreciation just by being there. In Buffetts and Munger's case, just showing
up at someone's doorstep adds value to their house..

There's not a chance that anyone here, conservative, speculative, value guided
or not could have a comparable effect. Therefore it seems to me there's an
investor and there's an Investor of quite another nature who's strategies we
may mimick but not be on equal footing with.

Jim
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/11/2002 11:53:49 PM
From:Paul Senior
Maybe its time to mention TRC again, now that I see its price has come down.
TRC - that perpetual and inexplicable bargain.

I'll add it to my watch list.

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=TRC&d=c&t=2y&l=on&z=b&q=l
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 3:52:35 AM
From:AmericanVoter
Papaya King,

on SGR, if you discount the cash at hand by the amount of debt, you get a cash
value of $2.41/shr only.

regards
amein
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 8:44:02 AM
From:xdimitri
from this morning's press :

<<
Software giant Peoplesoft (PSFT:Nasdaq - news - commentary - research -
analysis) said it won't change the way it treats stock options on its financial
statements, arguing that making them a compensation expense would stifle
innovation.
...
"Expensing stock options will discourage companies from using them as
incentives for innovation," Peoplesoft said. "In a competitive global economy,
innovation and the creation of shareholder value have helped the U.S. maintain
its economic leadership."
>>

"incentive for innovation" and "creation of shareholder value" as an
excuse...what a joke.

dimitri
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 9:36:36 AM
From:Bob Rudd
Don: Your concept of limiting investment universe to those companies
compensating CEO's below reasonable limits, "As a rule of thumb I shy away from
companies where the top executive makes over $400K for a small cap, $800K for a
mid cap, and $1.5M for a large cap." is appealing, but like Paul, I'm thinking
that it may, while being on the right side of the issue, not be effective by
excessively limiting investible universe. Did you base the limits on any
research or just casual observation?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 11:23:52 AM
From:Seeker of Truth
Yes you are certainly right. But Buffett's basic ideas, e,g, looking for
something special about the company which keeps the competition from
proliferating, is valid for any kind of investor.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 11:27:53 AM
From:j g cordes
Can't argue with that..
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 12:04:44 PM
From:Don Earl
Bob,

<<<Did you base the limits on any research or just casual observation?>>>

That's sort of a hard question to answer. It's something I've been doing for so
long that trying to explain it is a bit like explaining why I apply the brakes
at a certain point when approaching a stop sign. It's something I look at on
every company, and the observation isn't casual. It's part of the research I
do, but I've never tried to put check marks on a spread sheet. Maybe it's more
that human nature is such that greed tends to feed on itself. Running a company
is hard work and those with that kind of ability should be well paid. At the
same time I think there is a line that gets crossed when greed kicks in. It
tends to show up as both over compensation and excessive SG&A. SG&A starts to
be a slush fund for expensive company cars, jets, expense accounts, junkets to
exotic places, etc. I doubt any of the over paid executives would ever have
come close to the level of riches many of them seem to think they deserve
without the injection of cash into their businesses by the public.

I'll give a couple examples. DWSN, which I've never owned but look at fairly
often because I like the company, and SEI which I made a fair amount of money
on this year on short play. Both companies are in the same sector and have been
around for years. DWSN has about as clean a balance sheet as you'll find and
SEI is on the verge of bankruptcy. DWSN stays close to break even on free flow
cash, is debt free and doesn't play any games with the numbers, even if it
means reporting a loss. SEI burns an average of $60 million a year, is up to
their eyebrows in debt, and up until recently was reporting wonderful EPS
numbers. The ex-CEO of SEI took in $4 million last year in compensation. The
CEO of DWSN took in $150K.

Those are probably extreme examples, but the pattern is there if you look for
it. Since I tend to cherry pick rather than diversify, it doesn't break my
heart to pass up a company as a potential investment on issues of compensation.
It's just one of a long list of items I view as being a red flag.

IMO, a good officer of a public company should make enough money to live
comfortably plus a little something to give the impression of success. The
compensation should not be so high it becomes a major drain on the company's
profitability, especially during down cycles. Stock and option grants should
align the executives interests with those of shareholders, without excessive
dilution. Since top executives are ultimately responsible for the success of a
company, I think issues of compensation give a bird's eye view of how those
executives treat their responsibility to shareholders.

There have been enough recent examples of how greed rots a perfectly good
company from the top down that I feel there is some merit in putting some focus
on compensation. When I hire someone to perform a service for me, I'm looking
for someone who will do the best job, for the most competitive price. It
basically amounts to the same thing when I buy stock. I become an owner of the
company and I want someone working for me who will protect my assets and
increase their value, at a competitive level of compensation. If I can find
someone who will do a good job for $300K per year, I can't think of a good
reason to pay someone else a million.

As usual, I expect there are lots of different opinions on the topic. FWIW,
that's mine.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 12:59:01 PM
From:Paul Senior
Wallace Rivers, (or anyone else following CMO): Do you have a current opinion
on CMO? Grommit's link to insider sales scared me off, but now that the stock's
come down a little...

Dividend is not sustainable, I'd guess. I notice though that they have paid
dividends at least since '85 or '86. Not that that will help stockholders going
forward from today.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 1:25:34 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Timba,

Here is another hi-tech company for option consideration:

http://www.siliconinvestor.com/readmsg.aspx?msgid=17865856

Microsoft already bought back 127.9 million shares at a cost of $6.1 billion in
the last fiscal year. But that has primarily offset dilution from options as
the number of shares outstanding has remained stable in the past year at about
5.6 billion.

From a single glance, looks quite a lot of money to me -almost equal to
reported income. But then I did not do in-depth research.

Jurgis - would be interested in your comments on INTC and MSFT if you get to
it...
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 1:37:03 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Don,

Another question on high executive compensation: do you consider the exercised
options when you compare the executive pay to your limits? If you do, this
pretty much eliminates all tech companies from investment horizon. Comments?

Jurgis - e.g. INTC: 1.9M CEO pay, 17.3M!!! exercised options per Yahoo for
2001.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 2:25:03 PM
From:sjemmeri
CKR valuation looks good but it doesn't seem they are making any progress with
turning the Hardee's acquisition (many more stores than Carl's Jr.)into
profits. I'd like to see them bite the bullet and convert them all to Carl's
Jr. JBX, YUM, etc. all look reasonable but not compelling as values and all
have wrong kind of momentum.
Also, I added very small position in PALM and am looking close at AKLM.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 3:10:56 PM
From:TimbaBear
Jurgis Bekepuris

Am done collecting the data on INTC, should be able to start posting the report
this week. I don't like MSFT but still may do research on them anyway. If so,
it'll be next after INTC.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 3:17:21 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Timba,

Thanks for response. I should be doing my own dd, but unfortunately I'm a bit
overworked on my regular job right now.

Jurgis - maybe I should stick to my regular job
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 4:55:39 PM
From:TimbaBear
Can anyone tell me how to ensure that a table of data looks OK when posted
here? I know there used to be symbols that had to precede and end the table,
but I can't find where they are listed on SI.

Thanks for your help.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 5:03:34 PM
From:Dale Baker
Use the "Use Fixed Font" option when you post - text tables will appear in
original format then. Not sure it will work with HTML tables, however.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 5:21:06 PM
From:TimbaBear
Dale

Thank you!

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 6:51:56 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Don: <<the pattern is there if you look for it>> Sometimes the 'looking for it'
imposes patterns where there are none. I looked around for some unbiased
academic research and found some stuff that sort of gets at it, but none that
really answers the question. One item indicated that compensation was highly
associated with CEO charisma, but not well related to performance.
My guess is that over a broad sample compensation would be relatively
uncorrolated with future performance, but somewhat positively correlated with
past performance...but that's just a guess at this point.
I suspect there's going to be market driven forces that will put the brakes
excessive compensation as it comes more to light that compensations doesn't buy
performance and isn't really needed for retention...but again just a guess.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 10:07:47 PM
From:Paul Senior
OT: Shorting. I'm starting to see tax questions raised on other threads (e.g.
Zeev Head's) regarding short selling. Namely, when, if ever, is a short sale a
long-term gain for US tax purposes. (And I'm even seeing the wrong answer being
supplied.) The fact that the question is being asked indicates there are many,
many people shorting, or about to, who've little or no experience doing this.

Possibly they've succumbed to the belief that one can make money in any kind of
market - it's just how you play it - or, that because there's a tool that's
available (shorting), it'd be foolish not to make use of it. I believe the vast
majority of shorters will find successful shorting - the process of living with
and closing out a short - to be quite a bit different from the skill set used
in holding long positions.
In any case, it is discouraging for me to see people making a bet without even
understanding the simple tax consequence of that bet.

I'm trying to weigh if my observation about what I consider rank amateur
involvement in shorting is a positive for me or not. On the one hand, maybe a
positive might be that people - "the crowd?" are jumping on the shorting train
way too late after the journey has begun. But maybe it's not too late at all.
It just seems to me that fewer and fewer people are venturing out now to make
even intermediate term investments (1-3 years). And maybe with all the apparent
shorting going on, looking even that far out is really fighting the tape.

Certainly I see this with all my housing stocks. Fears that housing stocks are
expensive, that housing itself is overpriced, defaults are increasing, etc.
etc., have driven the stocks lower, and I'll guess the lower price has
attracted new shorts or maybe encouraged current short sellers to increase
their short positions if not their enthusiasm. They may be right. Still, those
stocks look very inexpensive based on price/sale, price/book, price/earnings.
DHI, one example, boasts a very good record for delivering bottom line results:
"The company's continued sales momentum combined with our record backlog ensure
that fiscal 2002 will be our 25th consecutive year of growth and profitability,
and position us for another record year in fiscal year 2003," Chairman Donald
R. Horton has said (7/22/02). Now it's very possible that the shorts will be
proven right (that DHI stock and others similar will drop further); and it's
even also possible that the longs will be proven right too (the stocks will
eventually go back to their previous highs, or higher). I use the home builders
as an example to state that it will be my opinion that if the shorts make money
here that's good (for them) but not all well-and-good. The employing of
shorting techniques by the average investor, and the particular shorting of
stocks in this sector or others like it that show good fundamentals and decent
future prospects, which, if they were to provide profits to the short, I see as
lucky or fortuitous situations. And dangerous, if somebody assumes he or she
can replicate this success at other times and with other stocks or sectors.

jmo,
Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/12/2002 10:18:22 PM
From:Broken_Clock
Thanks.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 12:02:53 AM
From:Don Earl
Jurgis,

I'm mainly looking at cash compensation in the numbers I quoted. At the same
time, I really don't get a warm fuzzy feeling when I see an officer exercise a
ton of options just to turn around and dump it on the open market. I can't
think of a better way for an insider to tell the market he thinks investors are
suckers for buying stock in his company.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 12:27:26 AM
From:Spekulatius
While AZ is an also run in the US is it the #1 insurance company in Europe. AZ
has a large market share in the very stable and profitable life insurance
segment, very valuable stock holdings (Muenchener Rueck) and stakes insurance
companies allover the world. it also owns a bank business (Dresdner Bank which
is currently struggling).
As mentioned before, the company has a long operating history and has been
traditionally conservatively managed. the current valuations are very low
compared to historic valuation and I just bet on this stock coming back.

(I have swingtraded this stock sucessfully once for an 8% gain and plan to do
so again if the current volatility opens up trading opportunities)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 2:39:36 AM
From:tuck
For html, the method is to put "pre" in between these: <> before the table and
"/pre" in between these: <> at the end of the table. I believe "pre" stands for
preserve, as in preserve the formatting. Great for pasting quarterly financials
and the like.

Cheers, Tuck
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 8:09:45 AM
From:TimbaBear
Tuck

Thank you! Those are the instructions I had seen but couldn't dredge up from
the memory banks and couldn't find on SI.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 1:03:17 PM
From:Bob Rudd
PKS: Speculative bet today at 5.45 after stock collapsed due to miss. Basically
3 parks contibuted 100% of miss according to comments on the CC. I suspect they
can fix the problems...rest of parks on track. Headwinds this year from 911 &
economy should abate over next 2 years. No debt covenant issues near current
and expected EBITDA levels[they repeated this several times on the CC]. I DON'T
think this has been correctly priced thru most of it's history, but I suspect
the overpricing has been over corrected at current record low levels. Next year
they expect 65mm FCF which would equate to P/FCF around 7.7...not bad, but no
screaming bargain considering they have substantial debt.
The theme park biz is somewhat insulated from DIRECT competitors because once
one is in an area, it's pretty dumb to build another. The local/regional aspect
offers a vacation venue without air travel hassles.
All the downgrades today look like locking the barn AFTER the horses have been
stolen & processed into glue and dogfood.
I have not performed a highly in-depth analysis and may revise after further
look.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 1:23:48 PM
From:Bob Rudd
PAUL: Shorts - Completely agree that it's tough to do. I studied shorting
extensively and have seen some real smart people lose a chunk trying it. That
said, I think every serrious investor can benefit from studying how it's done -
not just the mechanics, but the stinky stuff to look for, and should
occasionally make modest short bets because it sharpens analytical skills and
broadens perspective.
Regarding the housing sector, I suspect that shorts there are missing the
essence of the story - consolidation based on financing advantages: Most home
building is done locally, the national guys have access to financing that
surpasses anything the locals can match. There may be other advantages like
some purchasing clout too, but methinks financing is the biggie. Also, this
housing bubble talk appears to incorporate an erroneous assumption that housing
prices are national....they're not, they're local.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 2:36:00 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Bob,

>The theme park biz is somewhat insulated from DIRECT
>competitors because once one is in an area, it's pretty
> dumb to build another.

I think you are wrong on this. See the massive buildout of competing theme
parks in Anaheim and Orlando area. Most (?)other locations have only one park,
but there is no guarantee that someone else will not come in and build a second
one.

Jurgis - no holdings in any theme-park-related companies
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 3:08:57 PM
From:Paul Senior
I'll add a little to my position in ACAS on today's drop.

It has been extensively analyzed on Yahoo; I've come to believe the long
position rather the the short. Short-sellers say funding of "dividends" comes
from, or necessitates, continual new stock issuances (Ponzi scheme).

(Dividends in quotes, because, as you know, ACAS is a Business Development
Company in which it is earnings, if any, that are delivered to the
stockholders, not the classic distributed-amount-after-taxes classic
definition.)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 4:06:01 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Jurgis<<I think you are wrong on this. See the massive buildout of competing
theme parks in Anaheim and Orlando area. Most (?)other locations have only one
park, but there is no guarantee that someone else will not come in and build a
second one.>>My take is that Anaheim and Orlando are positioned as destination
properties - unless people fly, those parks die. The key to their success is
critical mass of entertainment properties that justify a week long stay. The
regional parks, by contrast, are day trip destinations where a family drives
and returns same day or weekend. A single large park is a good match for this.
Do you know of anyone that has built a major park next to an existing regional?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 5:00:53 PM
From:Paul Senior
PKS is an interesting bet, I'd say. On the one hand, since I'm a fan of stocks
at their lows, PKS has never traded lower than today. It's getting downgraded,
but at some point, I'd guess park attendance will be up, and analysts will
again upgrade the stock, whether on attendance, favorable demographics, new
attractions, land values, vacation get-aways, etc. I'd say the stock is a good
bet to recover. The company's got great brand awareness, and they seem to be
very good at marketing.

But there are some very disturbing things too. If the company's so strong and
well-positioned as I suspect, how come they haven't shown a profit since 1998?
The stock got hit today because the company failed to meet expectations. I
don't understand why expectations would be so high (to crater the stock 50%)
when this company has so long not delivered to the bottom line. And book value
just keeps decreasing. Long term debt is at twice book value.

For me, PKS is one of those stocks that I can make a gentleman's bet will
recover - a double or more within a couple of years. But I won't put my own
money into the stock because to me the stock, without earnings, has been
overvalued for years. It's just my guess that people will once again come to
value PKS at those prices which seem so inexplicable (and so high) to me.

Paul S.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 5:43:30 PM
From:Seeker of Truth
The return on equity for ACAS is unacceptably small for a value stock. It looks
like a rank speculation to me.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 6:39:01 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Bob,

>Anaheim and Orlando are positioned as destination
> properties - unless people fly, those parks die.

Possibly, though I know quite a lot of Californians that used to drive for one
day to Disneyland. (I also know some that drive for 1-2 days to Las Vegas, but
that's another story :-))). Of course, with the current huge expansion in
Anaheim, there are not enough Californians to recoup the investment. ;-)

>The regional parks, by contrast, are day trip destinations
> where a family drives and returns same day or weekend. A
> single large park is a good match for this.
>Do you know of anyone that has built a major park next to
> an existing regional?

Any examples of "existing regionals"? The only one I know is Six Flags in LA
area and it definitely feels competition from Anaheim. Before, Disneyland was
less of a competition, since it was more geared towards children than
teenagers, but nowadays I think the new additions are starting make more
competition. For example, both Anaheim and Six Flags added water parks.

Oh, there is also a park in Silicon Valley, whatever it's called... I guess it
does not have much competition.

Overall, I thought it was a great business too. I am not so sure right now. It
is possible to overbuild and the brand moat is not that deep. E.g. if Disney
comes into Six Flags' turf, it is not very clear which one has more brand
recognition or franchise attraction...

Jurgis - but then I rarely go to theme parks so what do I know...
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 7:25:17 PM
From:Madharry
Wonder if anyone is trying on UAL for size? I am having difficulty
understanding that a company with $2.5B in cash would file for bankruptcy. the
market cap of the the company is $153MM according to SI. Why wouldnt they try
to renegotiate better terms with their lenders? I dont see the govt ponying up
$2B in loan guarantees to save shareholder butts. especially if the market cap
is now so low, and they have been pummeled on the us air bankruptcy . any
thoughts?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 9:14:27 PM
From:Paul Senior
Malcolm Bersohn: re. ACAS. It could be considered a speculation in some ways.
Given ACAS's investment in 51 different companies, I see where a "thorough
analysis" to assure "safety of principal" may not be possible by any outsider.
And the fact that ACAS has only been public since '97 also drags down on one's
assurance.

Still, its annualized IRR since IPO is 25.4%, with net operating income
increasing each year. Net assets have increased each year, and the dividend is
high (as one would expect from a Business Development Corp.).

You say the ROE is unacceptably small for a value stock. That suggests one of
your criteria for a value stock is that it have a minimum, threshold-level ROE?

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 9:34:31 PM
From:Paul Senior
Hi Madharry. Sorry I don't have the answers you seek.

Looks to me like airline stocks are kaput. Strange to me how railroad stocks
are doing well and so much better than airline stocks.

If my experience with banks for an onerous real estate loan is anything like
companies' experiences with their bankers, those bankers won't refi on anywhere
near acceptable terms to the airlines. Maybe in bankruptcy.

I've been adding a little bit to my position in AMR. I still own a little KLM,
only a smidgen of DEL, and a sprinkle of MAIR. I took my losses in UAL several
months ago.

I understand the desert is strewn with mothballed planes. More coming. The
Fokkers!
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/13/2002 11:36:50 PM
From:j g cordes
A piece on Value Investing by Sanjay Bakshi, a devotee..

http://www.capitalideasonline.com/chetan/sanjay_valueinvesting.htm

At the bottom of the above paper find "The Evolution of the idea of "Value
Investing": From Benjamin Graham To Warren Buffett." , which is a downloadable
pdf done by a phi beta capa at Duke.. what's interesting about it is that it
was written in 2000 (its tenor on then current market).

Also at the bottom of the above url is an article "What Has Worked in
Investing." Interesting piece that sorts out some approaches.

Jim
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 8:32:09 AM
From:Keith J
Theme parks are significantly affected by local conditions. I just returned
from CA, where I heard a radio ad for the new Disney theme park - 1 child
ticket free with every paid adult ticket. Have never heard of discounting that
much in the theme park arena.

KJ
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 8:34:09 AM
From:Keith J
Issue is UAL's labor costs are too high, and bankruptcy would enable them to
renegotiate the labor contracts if the unions don't agree to concessions.

KJ
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 10:58:58 AM
From:Allen Furlan
Open question to thread. Has anyone discovered a site that
specializes/discusses convertible debt. As I previously posted I was able to
buy the sgr LYONS at 500. The companies long term debt is primarily in these
zero coupon bonds and there is a put attached which requires the company to
redeem the bonds at 683.61 in May 2004. The redemption can be cash or stock but
the stock would be priced at time of redemption. Since I like the stock these
convertibles are a conservative proxy with a very reasonable yield to maturity.
Merrill sent me an adobe file which lists dozens of LYONS. Most have the same
attribute, ie a 2-3 year out put attached. If a company seems credit worthy
some of these should be an interesting way for value investors to assess a
companies finances in order to capture a very nice return. As an aside if the
company did not have ability to redeem in cash then the issuance of stock would
have an effect similar to a toxic convertible. Any comments appreciated.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 11:23:10 AM
From:Bob Rudd
j g cordes: I would agree with your thesis that size and recognition can
provide Buffett with some unique advantages versus small players, but there's
also relative disadvantages such as the difficulty establishing or liquidating
a meaningful position at decent prices. I suspect if Buffett were our size he
would apply same core investing principles in terms of valuing businesses, but
would operate differently, taking advantage of flexibility afforded by smaller
size to enter and exit positions more quickly. I also suspect that Buffett our
size and without the reputational advantages would outperform Buffett with
reputational advantages but hampered by Berkshire's size.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 12:12:50 PM
From:TimbaBear
j g cordes

Thank you for posting the link to the Sanjay Bakshi article. An excellent
article which brought back to the fore some of the ideas of Graham regarding
the hidden value of an unleveraged company and how to think about that element
of valuation.

"What has worked in Investing", a 42 page brochure put out by Tweedy, Browne
Company, is free to anyone who requests it and is a very nice presentation with
(for me) startling documentation for the past returns in several value picking
styles. It is well worth the time to get it and read it.

Thanks again!

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 12:16:40 PM
From:j g cordes
Bob, re Buffett's size and influence.. which is it? Are you saying that he has
no significant advantage over the man in the street or not?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 12:19:30 PM
From:j g cordes
Timba.. you're welcome of course. Note the "What has worked in Investing," is
free at the bottom of the Sanjay url I posted.
http://www.capitalideasonline.com/chetan/sanjay_valueinvesting.htm
Just click on zip file, it should download and uncompress.

Jim
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 12:35:35 PM
From:TimbaBear
j g cordes

Thanks again! I had printed out the Sanjay Bakshi article this morning at home
(didn't expect it to be 27 pages long!)and couldn't tell from the printed
version whether or not that was a hot link.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 1:51:49 PM
From:Seeker of Truth
Absolutely, a value stock should have a decent return on equity. If they don't
then there is something wrong with the situation, either poor management or the
environment for that kind of business is unfavorable.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 1:57:50 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Interesting claim in Sanjay Bakshi's article:

"Buffett is known as a renowned growth investor, not as a value investor"

Hmm, I understand what he means, but it still is a weird quote.

Jurgis - some people would claim exactly opposite
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 2:01:05 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Malcolm,

I agree with you, but high ROE is Buffett investing, it is not value investing.

Classic value investing ala Graham does not look at return at all. The only
thing it looks at is valuation below 75% of current assets minus all
liabilities. Or something like that. :-)

Jurgis - never liked Graham, so bought TAVFX to do it for me... :-)))
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 3:32:17 PM
From:Bob Rudd
CEO/CFO signoffs: Pulled up data from SEC site
http://www.sec.gov/rules/extra/ceocfo.htm as of about 3pm EDT today nearly 400
of the 945 companies that are supposed to certify by 8/14 showed no letter
received. I would think it would be in a company's interest remove the
uncertainty as soon as possible to imply that certifying is an easy call for
them. That so many have not should make for an interesting day tomorrow.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 3:32:32 PM
From:Paul Senior
Malcolm Bersohn:

Return on equity is not mentioned in Graham's "Intelligent Investor".

Return on equity is not discussed in Dreman's "Contrarian Investment
Strategies".

There is a two-page discussion of ROE in Al Frank's "New Prudent Speculator".
It ends with, "After we check out ROE, compare it with historical trend and
rule-of-thumb levels, and check...what we have to pay for the equity and our
return on equity, we have done all we need to do with this selection
criterion." (p.48)

I checked my notes/articles on James O'Shaughnessy. ("What Works on Wall
Street") I find no discussion of ROE. It's neither used nor discussed in any of
his strategies.

ROE is one of the first things I look at. I use it like Al Frank does. Maybe
there's an absolute requirement for an ROE threshold for you-- experts don't
require it of themselves though from what I see. And as far as there "being
something wrong with the situation", I find that normal going into a value
stock. If there weren't something wrong, then the stock wouldn't be at a value
price.
--------------------------------------------
Can you offer some stocks that you believe to be value stocks that meet your
criteria?

Perhaps I'm looking at one now, HI (Household International)? Nice ROE, low
price. Cheap.
And ...(venting here)... dag-nabbit, I was too darn slow and placed my orders
for more HI this morning too darn low. And didn't move them up enough or
promptly. There has been quite a drop and comeback in the stock today.

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=HI&d=c&t=1d&l=on&z=b&q=l
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 3:48:17 PM
From:sjemmeri
Briefing.com has been tracking today's signoffs and report that the unsigned
are under 100:

15:34 ET The final 93 : There are now 93 listed and non-bankrupt companies
still not certifying who are required to do so today; recent removals from the
list: DUK, UHS, ATI, OCR, IPG, NVLS, CF, HCA, ASF, MWL.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 3:50:20 PM
From:Paul Senior
Thanks for the Sanjay Bakshi article. A keeper. Very excellent and helpful
article. I will try to give more consideration to viewing debt-free companies
from a lender's perspective. And the article's given me new impetus to go back
and look more closely for companies selling below cash.

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 4:13:49 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Paul,

While I agree with your arguments - though as I said, I do not practice value
investing - the Buffett argument for high ROE is not only that high ROE
indicates a great business. The other reason is that business should be earning
more than the risk free alternatives and more than it pays for loans.
Otherwise, it is not a sustainable business and should be liquidated.

In these times when risk free alternatives earn <4% and corporate loans are
around 8% depending on company, these requirements are not so important. But
they were in earlier times when bonds earned >10%. Buffett himself said that
buying treasuries when the yield was above 14% was a much better investment
than buying stocks at the same time. The annual return was higher than the
yield, since prices rose as new issue yields dropped.

Even now, if a company has ROE around 5%, the question is: why does this
company exist? Unless there is some hope for the ROE improvement, the company
should sell itself and invest the capital in bonds. It would make much more
sense for the shareholders.

Jurgis
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 5:17:12 PM
From:Paul Senior
Or sell itself, distribute the proceeds, and let the investors become their own
asset allocators with those proceeds.

Very seldom does one see companies selling themselves because of low ROE. Low
ROE companies are a fact.

They may be buyable though, depending on price (and risk tolerance). For
example, if American Airlines parent AMR could earn 5% on it's $28 book value
(in better times it's earned more), that'd be $1.40/sh. Which would give the
stock a 6.2x eps on the current stock price ($8.68). Or for investors' ROE,
that could be considered 1.40/8.58 = 16.1%. (aside: AMR is trying to reduce its
size, so maybe one might be lucky enough to eventually see even a mediocre 10%
return on a reduced book value, say a $20 or even a $14 bv.)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 5:38:14 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Paul,

>Very seldom does one see companies selling themselves
> because of low ROE.

Because insiders are not interested in the best interests of shareholders. And
shareholders most of the time do not have enough power.

BTW, even Buffett did not avoid this trap. He got into it out of sentimentality
with original Berkshire and again with Dexter Shoes. Business wise he should
have sold both much earlier. However, he cares about his companies and their
employees, so he did not sell... and I cannot blame him.

>They may be buyable though, depending on price (and risk tolerance).

Agreed. That's what Graham says too.

Regarding the AMR example, couple of points:

1. As I said, hope for change is one of the factors why investors buy these
companies and why these companies do not sell themselves.

2. At 5% ROE AMR is still not a viable business long term. One can value invest
in it at a price much below liquidation value (I DON'T KNOW IF THEY SELL AT
SUCH PRICE) so that investor ROI is much higher than 5% company's ROE. But if
it was possible to sell the whole AMR for its book value, it would be more
worthwhile to invest the money obtained from the sale into bonds than into
AMR's 5% ROE business.

3. One has to be extra careful in case of highly leveraged companies. If
company is paying 8% to earn 5%, it will go bankrupt sooner or later. In this
case, even the expected investor's ROI should probably be ignored, unless much
more dd is done.

4. Economically, there will always be companies earning low ROEs because of
various reasons. It is quite different question of whether to invest in them.

Jurgis - as I said: Graham is cool, but I'm no Graham ;-)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 6:33:42 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Steve: The SEC web site is evidently not updating intraday, as none of the
certifications were dated today. I saw a release somewhere that 71 were
uncertified. Nowhere near what my survey of the site showed not to have sent
letters. The rally today is probably a sigh of releif that only a relatively
small number have announced they can't certify.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 6:48:19 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Jim <<re Buffett's size and influence.. which is it? Are you saying that he has
no significant advantage over the man in the street or not?>>I'm saying that if
there were an unknown clone of Buffett, with his knowledge and skills, but
unhampered by Berkshire's size and whose every move wasn't watched or followed
by the markets...who could act relatively anonomously, that Buffet clone would
probably outperform Berkshire significantly. In support of this, please
consider Buffett's numerous statements that because of Berkshire's size,
there's no way an investor should expect future returns and outperformance to
mirror the past. Buffett does a great job of offsetting the size disadvantage
by using those advantages size and reputation do provide but it's just too
tough to find high payoff deals large enough to really move the needle due to
Berkshire's size.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 6:49:11 PM
From:Paul Senior
Jurgis Bekepuris, okay -g-, if you're no Grahammite, let's try Buffett.

Do you have a way to relate ROE to price to book value for these three
companies? I'm looking for an opinion - based primarily on those figures and
relationship - to indicate whether the stocks are now buys or sells.

DOV. Current price 28 in a range roughly between 26 and 43.
I'll superficially guess ROE is about 20-23%. Sells about 2.45x its approx. $11
book value.

HRB. Current price about 48 in a range roughly between 32-51. Maybe 20-25% ROE.
Selling at 6x book value of $7.56.

NKE. Current price about 44 in a range about 41-64. Past few years' ROE roughly
12-18%. Selling at 3x book value of 14.

I call DOV very close to being a buy based on its historical ROE, its current
book value, and its current price. (Given current interest rates. I've not
looked at debt, eps, other factors.) The other two stocks are, if they're not
overpriced, they're not bargains either. What's your opinion? (Or anyone else
who might care to comment on these stocks.)

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=dov+nke+hrb&d=t

Stocks were picked from last pages of following filing:
http://www.sec.gov/Archives/edgar/data/1067983/000095015002000747/a83556e13fvhr
txt
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 8:00:36 PM
From:Mark Marcellus
According to CNBC, the SEC won't even be done scanning the certifications until
Saturday, it will be some time after that before all of them make it to the Web
site. The SEC recommends going to individual company sites to get the up to
date status.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 9:53:11 PM
From:Don Earl
<<<The SEC web site is evidently not updating intraday>>>

And this is the agency touting faster disclosure to investors. The SEC is a
joke and doesn't amount to much more than a bureaucratic, slow motion, graft
machine. Don't expect to see much hoopla over the signing of the
certifications. The certifications and the recent legislation amount to nothing
more than a white wash job to sweep Enron and WorldCon under the rug. Does
anyone really expect meaningful changes from an administration created by
ballot tampering, funded by Enron, and where the VP is being sued for
accounting fraud from his stint as a CEO? You'd have as much luck having all
drug dealers in the US sign a certification stating they will quit selling
drugs. There's too much money involved to expect adding a puff of hot air to
the bubble will change anything.

The only potentially meaningful change available is to scrap GAAP altogether
and move strictly to tax accounting standards. So far our fearless leaders have
carefully avoided the prospect in favor of an attempt to put the toothpaste
back in the tube. Even Warren Buffet is against the idea as he knows a full
blown bear market is the only time his investment strategies are certain to
produce losses. In the mean time, the failure to bite the bullet when damage
could have been minimized will only result in a more severe crash later on.
Like the man said, "You can't fool all the people, all the time.". The one
thing all criminals have in common is their certain belief they will never get
caught. That belief eventually results in a mind set that even a small effort
to avoid getting caught isn't worth bothering with as they'll never get caught
anyhow, no matter how brazen their actions become. The end result is they
always get caught.

From: http://mktnews.nasdaq.com/newsv2/pullstory_nasd.asp?textpath=
\\News2\news_www\Nasdaq\news\35\2002\08\12\200208121752DOWJONESDJONLINE000652.h
ml&usymbol=9999

<<<As a further check on big U.S. companies, the SEC is screening the Fortune
500 companies. Beller said the process, which is nearly done, resulted in
reviews of hundreds of firms, including those that hadn't been scrutinized by
the SEC for three or more years.

More than 100 of the Fortune 500 firms have received comments on their
financial disclosure from the SEC already, and Beller the balance should be
issued by early fall.>>>

While it's nice the SEC looks at the filings every three years or so, I
wouldn't put too much faith in certifications. "It's okay, you can trust me.",
is a statement that has never failed to warn me I'm dealing with a liar. It's
something honest people never say. They don't have to.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:8/14/2002 9:55:06 PM
From:Paul Senior
Here's an example of what I'd call a value stock that has lousy ROE numbers:
IAL.

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=ial&d=t

Not much revenue growth:

http://quicken.com/investments/seceval/?cmetric=rev&symbol=ial

ROE stinks:
http://quicken.com/investments/seceval/?symbol=IAL&cmetric=health&cmetric=mgmt

Tangible book value (approx. $27 per S&P) has been increasing, but at a very
slow rate.

There's a $1.20/sh annual dividend. It's not been cut for at least the last ten
years (as far back as S&P reports.). But it doesn't look like it's been covered
by earnings for the past couple of years.

There's no long-term debt! Selling for about $18/sh and with a bv of $27, could
this then be a stock that might draw the interest of Mr. Sanjay Bakshi as one
of his "debt capacity bargains"?

This plodder company's lowest annual high value since '92 has been $23.56 (and
that was in '00). In other words there's been no year since 1992 that the stock
didn't trade at least as high as $23.55. (Of course that doesn't mean the
future will repeat in '02, or '03, or ever.)

I notice a couple of value funds are owners: FPA Capital, and Al Frank Fund.

-----
I've put the stock on my watch list. I want to see if I can buy it a bit closer
to its lows.
%EOM----------------------

